Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 1. Certificates of Public Convenience and Necessity; Rates; Service.
§ 77-3-35.
Regulation of rates and charges generally; approval of certain contracts of utilities; regulation of provision of telecommunication services; adoption of alternative methods of regulation; Public Service Commission authorized to regulate only rates, terms and conditions of certain switched access services and single-line flat rate voice communication services; incumbent local exchange carrier to provide primary single-line flat rate voice communication service to premises of permanent residence or business within its franchised service territory if cost to requesting party does not exceed certain amount; commission to retain exclusive original jurisdiction over customer complaints for services continuing to be regulated; certain telecommunication utilities required only to file financial or service quality information required to be filed with Federal Communications Commission.

Subject to the provisions of subsections (2) and (4) of this section, under such reasonable rules and regulations as the commission may prescribe, every public utility, as to the rates which are subject to regulation under the provisions of this article, shall file with the commission, within such time and in such form as the commission may designate, schedules showing such rates and charges established by it and collected and enforced, or to be collected or enforced within the jurisdiction of the commission. The utility shall keep copies of such schedules open to public inspection under such reasonable rules and regulations as the commission may prescribe.

No such public utility shall directly or indirectly, by any device whatsoever, or in anywise, charge, demand, collect or receive from any person or corporation for any service rendered or to be rendered by such public utility a greater or less compensation than that prescribed in the schedules of such public utility applicable thereto then filed in the manner provided in this section, and no person or corporation shall receive or accept any service from any such public utility for a compensation greater or less than prescribed in such schedules.

Utilities selling commodities or rendering any service to cooperatives, municipalities or other nonprofit organizations, shall, at the order of the commission, file schedules of such rates and charges for information purposes only.

The commission may provide, by rules and regulations to be adopted by it, the following:

That utilities may contract with a manufacturer that is not a utilityfor furnishing the services or commodities described in Section 77-3-3(d) (i), (ii)and (iii) for use in manufacturing;

That utilities described in Section 77-3-3(d)(i) alsomay contract with a customer that has a minimum yearly electric consumptionof two thousand five hundred (2,500) megawatt hours per year or greaterfor furnishing the services or commodities described in Section 77-3-3(d)(i); and

That utilitiesdescribed in Section 77-3-3(d)(ii) alsomay contract with a customer that has a minimum yearly consumptionof eight million five hundred thousand (8,500,000) cubic feet of gas per year or greater for furnishing the services or commodities described in Section 77-3-3(d)(ii).

These contracts may be entered into without reference to the rates or other conditions which may be established or fixed pursuant to other provisions of this article. Such regulations shall provide that before becoming effective any such contract shall be approved by the commission.

The Legislature recognizes that the maintenance of universal telephone service in Mississippi is a continuing goal of the commission and that the public interest requires that the commission be authorized and encouraged to formulate and adopt rules and policies that will permit the commission, in the exercise of its expertise, to regulate and control the provision of telecommunications services to the public in a changing environment where competition and innovation are becoming more commonplace, giving due regard to the interests of consumers, the public, the providers of telecommunications services and the continued availability of good telecommunications service. The commission is authorized to issue more than one (1) competing certificate of public convenience and necessity to provide local exchange telephone service in the same geographical area; provided, that the issuing of any such additional certificates shall not otherwise affect any certificate of public convenience and necessity heretofore issued to any provider of such services.

The commission shall adopt all rules and regulations necessary for implementing this subsection (2)(a).

The commission may apply standards adopted by the Federal Communications Commission that are generally applicable to companies that are designated and operate as eligible telecommunications carriers, pursuant to 47 USCS Section 214(e). The commission may exercise its authority to ensure that these carriers, including commercial mobile radio service providers that receive federal eligible telecommunications status, comply with those standards, only to the extent permitted by and consistent with applicable federal laws and regulations.

The commission retains the authority to issue orders to implement its rules, regulations and the provisions of this chapter, including the authority to grant and modify, impose conditions upon, or revoke a certificate.

The commission may, on its own motion or at the request of any interested party, enter an order, after notice and opportunity for hearing, determining and directing that, in the provision of a service or facility by a utility of the type defined in Section 77-3-3(d)(iii), competition or other market forces adequately protect the public interest, or that a service or facility offered by the utility is discretionary, and that the public interest requires that the utility’s rates and charges for such service or facility shall not thereafter be subject to regulation by the commission.

In making its determination whether the rates and charges for a service or facility shall not be subject to regulation by the commission, the commission may consider individually or collectively:

Whether the exercise of commission jurisdiction produces tangible benefits to the utility’s customers that exceed those available by reliance on market forces or other factors;

Whether technological changes, competitive forces, discretionary nature of the service or facility, or regulation by other state and federal regulatory bodies render the exercise of jurisdiction by the Mississippi commission unnecessary or wasteful;

Whether the exercise of commission jurisdiction inhibits a regulated utility from competing with unregulated providers of functionally similar telecommunications services or equipment;

Whether the existence of competition tends to prevent abuses, unjust discrimination and extortion in the charges of telecommunications utilities for the service or facility in question;

The availability of the service or facility from other persons and corporations; or

Any other factors that the commission considers relevant to the public interest.

In making the determination as above set forth, the commission may specify the period of time during which the utility’s rates and charges for the service or facility shall not thereafter be subject to regulation. Likewise, after notice and opportunity for hearing, the commission may revoke a determination and direction made under this section, when the commission finds that commission regulation of the utility’s rates and charges for the service or facility in question is necessary to protect the public interest.

The commission is authorized to consider and adopt alternative methods of regulation proposed by a utility of the type defined in Section 77-3-3(d)(i), (ii) or (iii) to establish rates for the services furnished by such utility that are fair, just and reasonable to the public and that provide fair, just and reasonable compensation to the utility for such services.

For purposes of this subsection, the phrase “alternative methods of regulation” means the regulation of utility rates and charges by methods other than the rate base or rate of return method of regulation set forth in other provisions of this article.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article or any other statute to the contrary, and consistent with the provisions herein, for those public utilities of the type defined in Section 77-3-3(d)(iii) that are subject to the competitive requirements set forth in 47 USCS Section 251 or those public utilities that have waived a suspension granted by the commission of the requirements of 47 USCS Section 251(b) and (c) as authorized by 47 USCS Section 251(f)(2), the Legislature has determined that, in the provision of all services, other than switched access service, competition or other market forces adequately protect the public interest. Therefore, subject to paragraph (d) of this subsection, the commission no longer has jurisdiction over the services, other than the provision of intrastate switched access service, provided by such public utilities.

For those public utilities of the type defined in Section 77-3-3(d)(iii) that have been granted a suspension by the commission of the requirements of 47 USCS Section 251(b) and (c) as authorized by 47 USCS Section 251(f) (2), the commission, at the request of such public utility, shall enter an order, after notice and opportunity for hearing, determining that such public utility’s provision of service will be subject to the same level of regulation as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection, but only after the commission determines that such public utility has satisfied one (1) of the following conditions:

Has executed interconnection agreements which have been approved by the commission to the extent required under law with two (2) or more local exchange carriers unaffiliated with such public utility;

Offers for resale at wholesale rates, pursuant to 47 USCS Section 251(c)(4)(A) and (B), such public utility’s retail telecommunications services provided to subscribers who are not telecommunications carriers;

At least two (2) competitive telecommunications providers unaffiliated with such requesting public utility are offering service to such public utility’s subscribers; or

Has experienced a material reduction in access lines or minutes of use in two (2) consecutive years.

A waiver of suspension under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be effective upon written notification to the commission. The initial rate utilized by such public utility shall be the rate for such service in effect at the time of such waiver under this section. The commission, upon request of the public utility, may return such public utility to a form of regulation permitted under this section.

Subject to paragraph (d) of this subsection, a public utility of the type defined in Section 77-3-3(d)(iii) which is regulated under the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be subject to any rule, regulation or order promulgated by the commission with regard to retail services. The provisions of Section 77-3-23 shall not apply to such public utility regulated under the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to affect the duties of an incumbent local exchange carrier arising under 47 USCS Sections 251 and 252 and the Federal Communications Commission’s regulations implementing these sections, or the commission’s authority to approve, arbitrate and enforce interconnection agreements and to resolve disputes pursuant to 47 USCS Sections 251 and 252 and the Federal Communications Commission’s regulations implementing these sections or any other applicable federal law or regulation. The commission shall exercise its jurisdiction in its role as a dispute resolution forum to hear complaints between certificated carriers, including complaints to prohibit anti-competitive practices and with respect to enforcement or modification of any wholesale self-effectuating enforcement mechanism plan in place as of July 1, 2011, and to issue orders to resolve such complaints, provided that such actions are consistent with federal telecommunications law. The commission shall interpret and apply federal, not state, substantive law. The commission shall adjudicate and enforce such claims in accordance with state procedural law and rules. No claim shall be brought to the commission as to which the FCC has exclusive jurisdiction. All complaints brought between carriers pursuant to this section shall be resolved by final order of the commission within one hundred eighty (180) days of the filing of the complaint.

The commission shall retain exclusive original jurisdiction over customer complaints for those services that continue to be regulated. For services no longer regulated, the commission shall have exclusive original jurisdiction to interpret and enforce the terms and conditions of customer service agreements for telecommunications services, but it shall not alter, set aside or refuse to enforce the rates, terms and conditions thereof, either directly or indirectly. No other party shall be allowed to participate in any such complaint proceeding, except for the customer, legal counsel or other representative of the customer, or the public utility involved.

A public utility of the type defined in Section 77-3-3(d)(iii) which is regulated under the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be required to file financial, service quality or other information with the commission. The calculation of the public utility regulatory tax established in Section 77-3-87 shall be based upon ninety thousandths of one percent (90/1000 of 1%) per year of the gross revenues from the intrastate operations of such public utility which is subject to regulation under the provision of paragraph (a) of this subsection. In addition, such public utility shall only be required to adhere to billing for retail telecommunications services in compliance with the federal truth in billing regulations prescribed by the Federal Communications Commission.

(i) In order to transition to the changes effectuated by paragraph (a) of this subsection, the rates, terms and conditions for products and services no longer subject to regulation by the commission which were in effect with a specific term immediately prior to July 1, 2006, shall remain in effect for the duration of the specific term as to customers who subscribed to such products or services prior to July 1, 2006. If no term applied to such products or services at the time such customer subscribed to such products or services, then the rates, terms and conditions governing such products or services shall remain in effect until a written customer service agreement becomes effective as described in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph (g).

1. To terminate service with the service provider by contacting such service provider within the thirty-day time period, in which case the customer shall have the right to pay off the account in the same manner and under the same rates, terms and conditions as set forth in the written customer service agreement provided to the customer, which written customer service agreement shall relate back in its entirety to the date of a new customer’s request for service or the date the agreement was sent to an existing customer, as applicable, and shall be in effect until termination through pay off; or

2. To use the services of the service provider or to otherwise continue the account with the service provider after the thirty-day time period has elapsed, either of which shall constitute the customer’s assent to all the rates, terms and conditions of the written customer service agreement. The customer service agreement shall be deemed received three (3) business days after deposit in the United States mail, first-class delivery.

Except as provided in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (g), the service provider shall offer existing and new customers a written customer service agreement, which in the case of new customers shall be delivered no later than thirty (30) days after the initiation of service. The customer service agreement shall include a provision advising the customer that he has thirty (30) days from receipt in which to elect:

If any service provider desires to modify in any respect any rates, terms or conditions of a customer service agreement, it shall provide at least thirty (30) days’ prior written notice of the modification and the proposed effective date to the customer. The customer service agreement shall include a provision advising the customer that he has the option:

1. To terminate service with the service provider by contacting such service provider prior to the effective date, in which case the customer shall have the right to pay off the account in the same manner and under the same rates, terms and conditions as then in effect; or

2. To use the services of the service provider or to otherwise continue the account with the service provider on or after the effective date, either of which shall constitute the customer’s assent to the modified written customer service agreement. The customer service agreement shall be deemed received three (3) business days after deposit in the United States mail, first-class delivery.

Nothing herein shall change the obligation of those public utilities described in Section 77-3-3(d)(iii) to obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity pursuant to this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-09; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 9; Laws, 1988, ch. 338; Laws, 1994, ch. 315, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 348, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 304, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 313, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 447, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 77-3-36.
Recovery of costs of political advertising from ratepayers prohibited; recovery of costs of promotional or institutional advertising regulated; definitions.

No public utility, the rates of which are subject to regulation by the commission, shall be permitted to recover from its ratepayers any direct or indirect expenditure made by such utility for political advertising as defined herein. For the purposes of this paragraph, “political advertising” means any advertising for the purpose of influencing public opinion with respect to legislative, administrative or electoral matters, or with respect to any controversial issue of public importance.

Except to the extent authorized by general regulation of the commission, no public utility, the rates of which are subject to regulation by the commission, shall be permitted to recover from its ratepayers any direct or indirect expenditure made by such utility for promotional or institutional advertising as defined herein. For the purposes of this paragraph, “promotional advertising” means any advertising for the purpose of encouraging any person to select or use the service or additional service of any utility or the selection or installation of any appliance or equipment designed to use such utility’s service, and “institutional advertising” means any advertising for the purpose of promoting the general image of a public utility in the community.

The commission shall establish by general regulation the types of promotional and institutional advertising which a public utility shall be permitted to recover as cost of service from the ratepayers and the reasonable cost thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved April 6, 1983).

§ 77-3-37.
Changes in rates.

No public utility shall make any change in any rate which has been duly established under this chapter, except as provided in this chapter. A public utility seeking a change in any rate or rates shall file with the secretary of the commission and the executive director of the public utilities staff a notice of intent to change rates. The commission may promulgate rules and regulations providing for notice to customers of the filing by any public utility for a rate increase. Routine changes in rates and schedules that do not involve any substantial revenue adjustment may go into effect after thirty (30) days’ notice to the commission or after such shorter period of notice as the commission, for good cause shown, may allow. In all other cases, the notice of intent shall contain a statement of the changes proposed to be made in the rates then in force, the new level of revenues sought, the reasons for the proposed changes and the date proposed for such changes to become effective, which date shall not be less than thirty (30) days after the date of filing. The proposed changes may be shown by filing new schedules, by plainly indicating the changes upon schedules filed and in force at the time and kept open to public inspection or by such other manner as will clearly indicate the rates to be changed and the rates proposed. All direct testimony, exhibits and other information which any utility will rely upon in support of the proposed changes shall be filed concurrently with the filing of the notice of intent. Such other data or documentation as the commission shall request shall be supplied by such utility.

The commission shall establish by rule and regulation a standard requirement list of documentation to be filed with or to be included in every notice of intent. With respect to any notice of intent involving a major change in rates as defined in subsection (8) of this section, the standard requirement list in each case shall include:

A copy of its charter or articles of incorporation, if not already on file with the commission;

A schedule of the present rates, fares, tolls, charges or rentals in effect, and the changes it is desired to make;

A balance sheet of the utility prepared as of the last day of the latest month in which data shall be readily available;

An actual operating statement setting forth revenue and expenses by account numbers for the twelve (12) months ending as the date of the balance sheet applicable to the utility filing the notice of intent;

A pro forma operating statement in the same form as the actual operating statement showing estimate of revenue and expenses for the twelve-month period beginning with the effective date of the changed rates (i) without giving effect to the changed rates and (ii) giving effect to the changed rates;

A pro forma operating statement in the same form as the actual operating statement for the same period giving effect to the proposed changes in rates and adjusted for known changes in the cost of operations;

A statement showing the number of stations or customers by classes affected by the proposed changes in rates, the actual revenue under the old rates arising from each class and the annual amount of the proposed increase or decrease applicable to each class;

A description of the utility’s property, including a statement of the original cost of the property and the cost to the utility;

A statement in full of the reasons why the change in rates is desired so that the commission may clearly see the justification therefor;

The amount and kinds of stock authorized;

The amount and kinds of stock issued and outstanding;

The number and amount of bonds authorized and the number and amount issued;

The rate and amount of dividends paid during the five (5) previous fiscal years, and the amount of capital stock on which dividends were paid each year;

An analysis of surplus covering the period from the close of the last calendar year for which an annual report has been filed with the commission to the date of the balance sheet attached to the notice.

The commission may, by rule and regulation, require the utility filing a notice of intent to change rates to supplement the above data with such other information as the commission or the public utilities staff may reasonably request.

Unless the commission, upon application by a utility and for good cause shown, shall enter an order waiving one or more of the following requirements, then whenever a public utility files a notice of intent wherein an increase in the level of annual revenues in the amount of at least Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00) is sought, the standard requirement list of documentation shall include:

Guidelines or directives as to the public utility’s presentation provided by a controlling affiliate, parent or holding company;

Marginal cost data;

Alternate rate design;

Conservation effectiveness;

A properly prepared, complete, detailed lead-lag study for the test year for the total company, Mississippi retail, other retail jurisdictions and Federal Energy Regulatory Commission wholesale rates in support of the public utility’s total working capital requirement contained therein, including all working papers in support thereof;

Direct testimony proposed to be offered at a hearing.

The notice of intent for major changes in rates as defined in subsection (8) of this section shall state the test period adopted by the public utility in support of its proposed rate changes, which may be a twelve-month period beginning with the proposed effective date of the rates proposed in the notice. For the purpose of expediting the regulatory process, all public utilities shall keep the commission advised of their plans or needs for future requests for major rate changes.

Within five (5) days after the notice of intent has been filed, the utility shall serve a copy of the notice of intent without documentation on all parties of record in its last proceeding in which a major change in rates was sought, and shall file a certificate of service with the commission. Thereafter, a copy of all material filed by the utility shall be furnished by the utility to those persons as may be provided for by the commission’s rules and regulations.

When the rates in a notice of intent are suspended by commission order, the commission may issue a scheduling order which establishes deadlines for submitting data requests, responding to data requests, conducting prehearing conferences and hearings and disposing of other matters necessary for the orderly disposition of the case.

The public utilities staff and all intervenors or protestants shall file all direct testimony, exhibits and other information which is to be relied upon regarding the proposed changes within eighty (80) days from the filing of such notice of intent. At the time of filing direct testimony, exhibits and other information, each party filing such documents shall serve copies of the documentation on all other parties of record and shall file a certificate of service with the commission.

The commission, for good cause shown, may, except in the case of major changes, allow changes in rates to take effect at the end of thirty (30) days from the date of the filing and the notice of intent, or on the effective date set out in the notice, without requiring any further proceedings, under such conditions as it may prescribe. All such changes shall be immediately indicated by such public utility upon its schedules. “Major changes” means (a) an increase in rates which would increase the annual revenues of such public utility more than the greater of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) or two percent (2%), but shall not include changes in rates allowed to go into effect by the commission or made by the public utility pursuant to an order of the commission after hearings held upon notice to the public, or (b) a change in the rate design which has a significant impact on a class or classes of ratepayers.

For all major changes in rates and schedules as defined in subsection (8) of this section, a public utility as defined in Section 77-3-3(d)(iv) shall provide, not later than twenty (20) days after filing the notice of intent to change rates, notice of such proposed change within each affected customer’s bill or invoice and in a newspaper having general circulation in the area where service is being provided by the public utility. The notice shall state the date on which the notice of intent was filed with the commission and shall include a financial impact statement showing the average amount of increase to customers by class and usage. The filing public utility shall file a copy of the notice, along with a certificate with the executive secretary of the commission, verifying that notice to each of the utility’s affected customers was provided in a timely manner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7716-10; Laws, 1956, ch. 372, § 10; Laws, 1983, ch. 467, § 15; Laws, 1985, ch. 302, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 310, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 530, § 39; Laws, 1992, ch. 417, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 540, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1997.